Washington statutes.
RCW 18.85.031

Commission—Educational conferences—Examinations of applicants for licenses.

The commission shall have authority to hold educational conferences for the benefit of the industry, and shall conduct examinations of applicants for licenses under this chapter. The commission shall ensure that examinations are prepared and administered at examination centers throughout the state and may approve examination locations in foreign jurisdictions.

[ 2008 c 23 s 9; 1997 c 322 s 4; 1977 ex.s. c 24 s 1; 1953 c 235 s 18. Formerly RCW 18.85.085.]